Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2326.01
Public money in hands of county and court officials; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 77-2313 to 77-2326.09, (1) county board shall include county commissioners or county supervisors, as the case may be, and (2) public money shall include all funds which come into the hands of county judges, clerks of the county court, or clerks of the district court pursuant to any provision of law authorizing such officers to collect or receive the same.

Laws 1947, c. 269, § 1, p. 868;

Laws 1988, LB 370, § 12;

Laws 1990, LB 1146, § 6.

Until enactment of this act, there was no statute providing a depository for funds held by clerks of the district courts. Bordy v. Smith, 150 Neb. 272, 34 N.W.2d 331 (1948).